Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.015

System created—Administration.

A retirement system is hereby created for public safety employees of the Washington state department of corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, the Washington *state liquor control board, county corrections departments, and city corrections departments not covered under chapter 41.28 RCW. The administration and management of the retirement system, the responsibility for making effective the provisions of this chapter, and the authority to make all rules necessary therefor are hereby vested in the department. All rules shall be governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. This retirement system shall be known as the Washington public safety employees' retirement system.

[ 2004 c 242 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.